Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.150

Application for license—May be secured by mail—Execution and acknowledgment.

Any person may secure by mail from the county auditor of the county in the state of Washington where he or she intends to be married, an application, and execute and acknowledge said application before a notary public.

[ 2011 c 336 s 685; 1963 c 230 s 2; 1939 c 204 s 3; RRS s 8450-2.]